Washington statutes.
RCW 18.44.460

License suspension—Nonpayment or default on educational loan or scholarship.

The director shall suspend the license of any person who has been certified by a lending agency and reported to the director for nonpayment or default on a federally or state-guaranteed educational loan or service-conditional scholarship. Prior to the suspension, the agency must provide the person an opportunity for a brief adjudicative proceeding under RCW 34.05.485 through 34.05.494 and issue a finding of nonpayment or default on a federally or state-guaranteed educational loan or service-conditional scholarship. The person's license shall not be reissued until the person provides the director a written release issued by the lending agency stating that the person is making payments on the loan in accordance with a repayment agreement approved by the lending agency. If the person has continued to meet all other requirements for licensing during the suspension, reinstatement shall be automatic upon receipt of the notice and payment of any reinstatement fee the director may impose.

[ 1999 c 30 s 15; 1996 c 293 s 11. Formerly RCW 18.44.125.]